California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
The open drug formulary, as established pursuant to this article, shall be implemented in one pilot project site. The site shall be located in a northern California test area, comprised of Sacramento and Placer Counties which includes urban, suburban, and rural settings. This pilot project shall not be implemented until federal approval is secured and full federal financial participation is assured.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1340, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

14195.3.

(a) For purposes of the open drug formulary pilot project as established by this article, a provider may be reimbursed for any drug prescribed to a beneficiary if the drug is prescribed by a licensed provider within the scope of his or her practice, as defined by law, and if the drug is approved for use by the federal Food and Drug Administration.

(b) Controlled substances shall be prescribed pursuant to the requirements of federal laws and regulations and the requirements set forth in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11150) of Division 10
 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) For purposes of the open drug formulary pilot project as established by this article, there shall be no requirement that prior authorization be obtained by a provider before prescribing any drug to a beneficiary if the provider determines the drug to be a medical necessity in the treatment of the beneficiary.

(d) For purposes of the open drug formulary pilot project as established by this article, a drug determined to be a medical necessity shall be one whose use in the treatment is reasonable and consistent with the objectives of the federal Medicaid Act as set forth in Title XIX of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.).

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 135, Sec. 7.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

14195.4.

A Medi-Cal Therapeutic Drug Utilization and Review Committee is hereby established. The committee shall be composed of 17 members who shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing powers as follows:

(a) The Governor shall appoint two representatives from the State Department of Health Services, one representative from the Health and Welfare Agency, and two representatives from schools of pharmacy.

(b) The Governor, the Speaker of the Assembly, and the Senate Rules Committee shall each appoint one
 representative from the following groups:

(1) Licensed pharmacists.

(2) Licensed physicians.

(3) Drug manufacturers.

(4) Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 14195.1 (as added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1636) by Stats. 1985, Ch. 135, Sec. 4.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

14195.5.

The Medi-Cal Therapeutic Drug Utilization and Review Committee shall set standards for evaluation of the therapeutic outcomes of prescribed drugs to be applied by an expert contractor to the department. The committee shall have the following responsibilities:

(a) Developing policy for monitoring and controlling therapeutically inappropriate drug utilization.

(b) Overseeing the establishment of a computer-based information system using the State Medicaid MMIS System, which shall provide timely
 information on drug prescription and consumption and shall be capable of tracking prescriptions by drug, by illness, by beneficiary, and by provider.

The committee shall consult with expert contractors experienced in therapeutically oriented drug utilization review in the discharge of this responsibility. 

(c) Establishing standards, in consultation with an expert contractor experienced in the therapeutically oriented drug utilization review, for dosage, duration, and effectiveness of medications with respect to a particular diagnosis.

(d) Setting standards to serve as guidelines on misprescribing, overprescribing, and contraindicated drug use, and protocols for informing prescribers of inappropriate prescribing.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 14195.2 (as added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1636) by Stats. 1985, Ch. 135, Sec. 5.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

14195.6.

The department shall develop a request for a proposal, and may award a contract to an expert contractor to implement the standards and practices established by the Medi-Cal Therapeutic Drug Utilization Review System through use of a therapeutically oriented drug utilization review system by July 1, 1989. The contract shall include a requirement to analyze the therapeutic outcomes of the Medi-Cal Drug Program using the California MMIS for the period of July 1, 1987, through the date the standards established by this article are implemented. Thereafter, the contractor shall submit quarterly reports to the department and the
 Legislature analyzing therapeutic outcomes in a manner that will allow comparisons with the experience analyzed for the period of July 1, 1987, until implementation of the standards established by this article. The analysis shall include reports on at least the following items:

(a) Compatibility of medication to diagnosis.

(b) Overprescribing of drugs.

(c) Prescription of contraindicated or incompatible drugs.

(d) Number of days of drug-induced hospitalization and institutionalizati on in nursing facilities or all categories of intermediate care for the developmentally disabled occurring because of the factors specified in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive.

(e) Number of days of
 drug-induced hospitalization and institutionalizati on in nursing facilities or any category of intermediate care facility for the developmentally disabled avoided due to changes in drug regimes which result from compliance by prescribers and beneficiaries with the standards established pursuant to this article.

The department is authorized to require the contractor to phase in implementation of the prescriber notification, as established by protocols for informing prescribers of inappropriate prescribing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1329, Sec. 33.   Effective September 26, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

14195.7.

This article shall not apply to any service rendered by a provider in conjunction with any capitated rate or primary care case contract negotiated pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) by either the department or the California Medical Assistance Commission unless both parties to the contract mutually agree that application of the standards established by this article would be beneficial to the Medi-Cal eligibles enrolled in plans operating pursuant to capitated rate contracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1636, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

14195.9.

In no case shall the director’s discretion under Section 14120 be exercised to reduce reimbursement to providers of pharmaceutical services because of increased costs in the drug component of the Medi-Cal program arising from the implementation of the open formulary concept.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1636, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

14196.

(a) The department shall adopt any regulations necessary to implement this article. These regulations shall be adopted as emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and, for the purposes of the Administrative Procedure Act, shall be deemed an emergency, and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare.

(b) Any provision of this article which is in conflict with any federal statute or regulation shall be inapplicable to
 the extent of that conflict but the remainder of the provisions shall be in effect to the extent no conflict exists.

The department shall seek all federal waivers necessary to implement this article. The provisions for which federal waivers cannot be obtained shall not be implemented, but provisions for which waivers are either obtained or found to be unnecessary shall be unaffected by the inability to obtain federal waivers for the other provisions.

(c) The department shall seek maximum federal reimbursement for the MMIS-based Drug Establishment Review System established by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1636, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.2. Short-Term Community Transitions [14196.2. - 14196.6.]

14196.2.

(a) (1) The Legislature finds and declares that in order to reduce the risk of transmission of COVID-19 during the current pandemic and to further the objectives of the Money Follows the Person Rebalancing Demonstration, a temporary program is hereby established to facilitate the transition of individuals from an inpatient facility who have resided in that setting for fewer than 60 days.

(2) The department shall provide services consistent with the Money Follows the Person Rebalancing Demonstration program, pursuant to Section 6071 of Public Law 109-171, and subsequent amendments, for transitioning eligible individuals out of inpatient facilities.

(b) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this article by means of letters, provider bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(c) Commencing January 1, 2026, the department shall cease to enroll beneficiaries pursuant to this article and commencing January 1, 2027, the department shall cease to provide services pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 898, Sec. 2.   (SB 281)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Sec. 14196.6.)
-------------------------------------------

14196.4.

The following definitions apply for purposes of this article:

(a) “Eligible individual” means a Medi-Cal beneficiary who meets both of the following requirements:

(1) The individual meets the definition of an “eligible individual” under Section 6071(b)(2) of Public Law 109-171, and subsequent amendments, except that the individual is not required to have resided for at least 60 consecutive days in an inpatient facility.

(2) The individual is targeted to receive assistance in transitioning from an inpatient facility to a qualified residence, identified in the agreement between
 the department and the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for the Money Follows the Person Rebalancing Demonstration, except the individual shall not be required to have resided for at least 60 consecutive days in an inpatient facility.

(b) “Inpatient facility” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 6071(b)(3) of Public Law 109-171, and subsequent amendments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 412.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Sec. 14196.6.)
-------------------------------------------

14196.5

(a) A Medi-Cal beneficiary who has resided for at least 60 consecutive days in an inpatient facility, as required by the Money Follows the Person Rebalancing Demonstration, is ineligible for services under this article unless the department determines that any necessary federal approvals have been obtained and federal financial participation is available for this purpose.

(b) Services shall not be provided pursuant to this article during any period that the department has obtained any necessary federal approvals under the Money Follows the Person Rebalancing Demonstration to not apply the eligibility requirement that the beneficiary has resided for at least 60 consecutive days in an inpatient
 facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 413.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Sec. 14196.6.)
-------------------------------------------

14196.6.

This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 898, Sec. 4.   (SB 281)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Art. 6.2, commencing with Section 14196.2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.3. Medi-Cal Managed Care Plans [14197. - 14197.9.]

14197.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department implement and monitor compliance with the time or distance requirements set forth in Sections 438.68, 438.206, and 438.207 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations and this section, to ensure that all Medi-Cal managed care covered services are available and accessible to enrollees of Medi-Cal managed care plans in a timely manner, as those standards were enacted in May 2016.

(b) Commencing January 1, 2018, for covered benefits under its contract, as applicable, a Medi-Cal managed care plan shall maintain a network of providers that are located within the following time or distance standards for the following services:

(1) For primary care, both adult and pediatric, 10 miles or 30 minutes from the beneficiary’s place of residence.

(2) For hospitals, 15 miles or 30 minutes from the beneficiary’s place of residence.

(3) For dental services provided by a Medi-Cal managed care plan, 10 miles or 30 minutes from the beneficiary’s place of residence.

(4) For obstetrics and gynecology primary care, 10 miles or 30 minutes from the beneficiary’s place of residence.

(c) Commencing July 1, 2018, for the covered benefits under its contracts, as applicable, a Medi-Cal managed care plan shall maintain a network of providers that
 are located within the following time or distance standards for the following services:

(1) For specialists, as defined in subdivision (i), adult and pediatric, including obstetric and gynecology specialty care, as follows:

(A) Up to 15 miles or 30 minutes from the beneficiary’s place of residence for the following counties: Alameda, Contra Costa, Los Angeles, Orange, Sacramento, San Diego, San Francisco, San Mateo, and Santa Clara.

(B) Up to 30 miles or 60 minutes from the beneficiary’s place of residence for the following counties: Marin, Placer, Riverside, San Joaquin, Santa Cruz, Solano, Sonoma, Stanislaus, and Ventura.

(C) Up to 45 miles or 75 minutes
 from the beneficiary’s place of residence for the following counties: Amador, Butte, El Dorado, Fresno, Kern, Kings, Lake, Madera, Merced, Monterey, Napa, Nevada, San Bernardino, San Luis Obispo, Santa Barbara, Sutter, Tulare, Yolo, and Yuba.

(D) Up to 60 miles or 90 minutes from the beneficiary’s place of residence for the following counties: Alpine, Calaveras, Colusa, Del Norte, Glenn, Humboldt, Imperial, Inyo, Lassen, Mariposa, Mendocino, Modoc, Mono, Plumas, San Benito, Shasta, Sierra, Siskiyou, Tehama, Trinity, and Tuolumne.

(2) For pharmacy services, 10 miles or 30 minutes from the beneficiary’s place of residence.

(3) For outpatient mental health services, as follows:

(A) Up to 15 miles or 30 minutes from the beneficiary’s place of residence for the following counties: Alameda, Contra Costa, Los Angeles, Orange, Sacramento, San Diego, San Francisco, San Mateo, and Santa Clara.

(B) Up to 30 miles or 60 minutes from the beneficiary’s place of residence for the following counties: Marin, Placer, Riverside, San Joaquin, Santa Cruz, Solano, Sonoma, Stanislaus, and Ventura.

(C) Up to 45 miles or 75 minutes from the beneficiary’s place of residence for the following counties: Amador, Butte, El Dorado, Fresno, Kern, Kings, Lake, Madera, Merced, Monterey, Napa, Nevada, San Bernardino, San Luis Obispo, Santa Barbara, Sutter, Tulare, Yolo, and Yuba.

(D) Up to 60 miles or 90 minutes from
 the beneficiary’s place of residence for the following counties: Alpine, Calaveras, Colusa, Del Norte, Glenn, Humboldt, Imperial, Inyo, Lassen, Mariposa, Mendocino, Modoc, Mono, Plumas, San Benito, Shasta, Sierra, Siskiyou, Tehama, Trinity, and Tuolumne.

(4) (A) For outpatient substance use disorder services other than opioid treatment programs, as follows:

(i) Up to 15 miles or 30 minutes from the beneficiary’s place of residence for the following counties: Alameda, Contra Costa, Los Angeles, Orange, Sacramento, San Diego, San Francisco, San Mateo, and Santa Clara.

(ii) Up to 30 miles or 60 minutes from the beneficiary’s place of residence for the following counties: Marin, Placer, Riverside, San
 Joaquin, Santa Cruz, Solano, Sonoma, Stanislaus, and Ventura.

(iii) Up to 60 miles or 90 minutes from the beneficiary’s place of residence for the following counties: Alpine, Amador, Butte, Calaveras, Colusa, Del Norte, El Dorado, Fresno, Glenn, Humboldt, Imperial, Inyo, Kern, Kings, Lake, Lassen, Madera, Mariposa, Mendocino, Merced, Modoc, Monterey, Mono, Napa, Nevada, Plumas, San Benito, San Bernardino, San Luis Obispo, Santa Barbara, Shasta, Sierra, Siskiyou, Sutter, Tehama, Trinity, Tulare, Tuolumne, Yolo, and Yuba.

(B) For opioid treatment programs, as follows:

(i) Up to 15 miles or 30 minutes from the beneficiary’s place of residence for the following counties: Alameda, Contra Costa, Los Angeles, Orange,
 Sacramento, San Diego, San Francisco, San Mateo, and Santa Clara.

(ii) Up to 30 miles or 60 minutes from the beneficiary’s place of residence for the following counties: Marin, Placer, Riverside, San Joaquin, Santa Cruz, Solano, Sonoma, Stanislaus, and Ventura.

(iii) Up to 45 miles or 75 minutes from the beneficiary’s place of residence for the following counties: Amador, Butte, El Dorado, Fresno, Kern, Kings, Lake, Madera, Merced, Monterey, Napa, Nevada, San Bernardino, San Luis Obispo, Santa Barbara, Sutter, Tulare, Yolo, and Yuba.

(iv) Up to 60 miles or 90 minutes from the beneficiary’s place of residence for the following counties: Alpine, Calaveras, Colusa, Del Norte, Glenn, Humboldt, Imperial, Inyo, Lassen, Mariposa, Mendocino,
 Modoc, Mono, Plumas, San Benito, Shasta, Sierra, Siskiyou, Tehama, Trinity, and Tuolumne.

(d) (1) (A) A Medi-Cal managed care plan shall comply with the appointment time standards developed pursuant to Section 1367.03 of the Health and Safety Code, Section 1300.67.2.2 of Title 28 of the California Code of Regulations, subject to any authorized exceptions in Section 1300.67.2.2 of Title 28 of the California Code of Regulations, and the standards set forth in contracts entered into between the department and Medi-Cal managed care plans.

(B) Commencing July 1, 2018, subparagraph (A) applies to Medi-Cal managed care plans that are not, as of January 1, 2018, subject to the appointment time standards described in subparagraph (A).

(C) A Medi-Cal managed care plan shall ensure that each subcontractor network complies with the appointment time standards described in subparagraph (A), unless already required to ensure compliance.

(2) A Medi-Cal managed care plan shall comply with the following availability standards for skilled nursing facility services and intermediate care facility services, as follows:

(A) Within five business days of the request for the following counties: Alameda, Contra Costa, Los Angeles, Orange, Sacramento, San Diego, San Francisco, San Mateo, and Santa Clara.

(B) Within seven business days of the request for the following counties: Marin, Placer,
 Riverside, San Joaquin, Santa Cruz, Solano, Sonoma, Stanislaus, and Ventura.

(C) Within 14 calendar days of the request for the following counties: Amador, Butte, El Dorado, Fresno, Kern, Kings, Lake, Madera, Merced, Monterey, Napa, Nevada, San Bernardino, San Luis Obispo, Santa Barbara, Sutter, Tulare, Yolo, and Yuba.

(D) Within 14 calendar days of the request for the following counties: Alpine, Calaveras, Colusa, Del Norte, Glenn, Humboldt, Imperial, Inyo, Lassen, Mariposa, Mendocino, Modoc, Mono, Plumas, San Benito, Shasta, Sierra, Siskiyou, Tehama, Trinity, and Tuolumne.

(3) A county Drug Medi-Cal organized delivery system shall provide an appointment within three business days to an opioid treatment program.

(4) A dental managed care plan shall provide an appointment within four weeks of a request for routine pediatric dental services and within 30 calendar days of a request for specialist pediatric dental services.

(e) The department may authorize a Medi-Cal managed care plan to use clinically appropriate video synchronous interaction, as defined in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 2290.5 of the Business and Professions Code, as a means of demonstrating compliance with the time or distance standards established pursuant to this section, as defined by the department. The use of telehealth providers to meet time or distance standards does not absolve the Medi-Cal managed care plan of responsibility to provide a beneficiary with access, including transportation, to in-person services
 if the beneficiary prefers.

(f) (1) The department may develop policies for granting credit in the determination of compliance with time or distance standards established pursuant to this section when Medi-Cal managed care plans contract with specified providers to use clinically appropriate video synchronous interaction, as defined in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 2290.5 of the Business and Professions Code, and only for Medi-Cal managed care plans that cover at least 85 percent of the population points in the ZIP Code.

(2) The department, upon request of a Medi-Cal managed care plan,
 may authorize alternative access standards for the time or distance standards established under this section if either of the following occurs:

(A) The requesting Medi-Cal managed care plan has exhausted all other reasonable options to obtain providers to meet the applicable standard.

(B) The department determines that the requesting Medi-Cal managed care plan has demonstrated that its delivery structure is capable of delivering the appropriate level of care and access.

(3) (A) If a Medi-Cal managed care plan cannot meet the time or distance standards
 set forth in this section, the Medi-Cal managed care plan shall submit a request for alternative access standards to the department, in the form and manner specified by the department.

(B) An alternative access standard request may be submitted at the same time as the Medi-Cal managed care plan submits its annual demonstration of compliance with time or distance standards, if known at that time and at any time the Medi-Cal managed care plan is unable to meet time or distance standards.

(C) A Medi-Cal managed care plan is not required to submit a previously approved alternative access standard request to the department for review and approval on an annual basis, unless the Medi-Cal managed care plan requires modifications to its previously approved request. However, the Medi-Cal managed care plan shall submit this previously approved alternative access standard request to the department at least every three years for review and approval when the plan is required to demonstrate compliance with time or distance standards.

(i) Medi-Cal managed care plans that do not meet time or distance standards without
 the use of an alternative access standards request shall submit to the department documentation demonstrating efforts to contract with providers in those areas, based on guidance by the department.

(ii) Effective no sooner than contract periods commencing on or after January 1, 2026, the Medi-Cal managed care plan shall inform enrollees of their option to use or not use telehealth, covered transportation services, or out-of-network providers to access covered services if the health care provider is located outside of the time or distance standards specified in subdivision (c) in a manner specified by the department.

(D) A Medi-Cal managed care plan shall close out any corrective action plan deficiencies in a timely manner to ensure that beneficiary access is
 adequate and shall continually work to improve access in its provider network.

(4) A request for alternative access standards shall be approved or denied on a ZIP Code and provider type, including specialty type, basis by the department within 90 days of submission of the request. The Medi-Cal managed care plan shall also include a description of the reasons justifying the alternative access standards based on those facts and circumstances. Effective no sooner than contract periods commencing on or after July 1, 2020, the Medi-Cal managed care plan shall include a description on how the Medi-Cal managed care plan intends to arrange for enrollees
 to access covered services if the health care provider is located outside of the time or distance standards specified in subdivision (c). The department may stop the 90-day timeframe, on one or more occasions as necessary, in the event of an incomplete submission or to obtain additional information from the Medi-Cal managed care plan requesting the alternative access standards. Upon submission of
 sufficient additional information to the department, the 90-day timeframe shall resume at the same point in time it was previously stopped, except if there is less than 30 days remaining in which case the department shall approve or deny the request within 30 days of submission of sufficient additional information. If the department rejects the Medi-Cal managed care plan’s proposal, the department shall inform the Medi-Cal managed care plan of the department’s reason for rejecting the proposal. The department shall post any approved alternative access standards on its internet website.

(5) (A) As part of the department’s evaluation of a request submitted by a Medi-Cal managed care plan to utilize an alternative access standard pursuant to this subdivision, the department shall evaluate and determine whether the resulting
 time or distance is reasonable to expect a beneficiary to travel to receive care.

(B) Effective for contract periods commencing on or after January 1, 2027, as part of the department’s evaluation of a request pursuant to this subdivision, the department shall also consider the sufficiency of payment rates offered by the Medi-Cal managed care plan to the provider type or for the service type for which an
 alternative access standard is being requested.

(6) The department may authorize a Medi-Cal managed care plan to use clinically appropriate video synchronous interaction, as defined in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 2290.5 of the Business and Professions Code, as part of an alternative access standard request.

(g) (1) (A) Effective for contract periods commencing on or after July 1, 2018, a Medi-Cal managed care plan shall, on an annual basis and when requested by the department, demonstrate to the department the Medi-Cal managed care plan’s compliance with the time or distance and appointment time standards developed pursuant to
 this section. The report shall measure compliance separately for adult and pediatric services for primary care, behavioral health, and core specialist services.

(B) (i) Effective for contract periods commencing on or after January 1, 2026, a Medi-Cal managed care plan shall, on an annual basis and when requested by the department, demonstrate to the department each subcontractor network’s compliance with the time or distance and appointment time standards developed pursuant to this section, including how the Medi-Cal managed care plan arranged for the delivery of
 Medi-Cal covered services to Medi-Cal enrollees, such as through the use of either Medi-Cal covered transportation or clinically appropriate video synchronous interaction, as specified in paragraph (6) of subdivision (f), if the enrollees of a Medi-Cal managed care plan needed to obtain health care services from a health care provider or a facility located outside of the time or distance standards, as specified in subdivision (c), in accordance with the CalAIM 1915(b) Waiver Special Terms and Conditions A4.

(ii) This subparagraph shall not apply to dental managed care plans, or to Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery systems as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 14184.101.

(2) Effective for contract periods commencing on or after July 1, 2020, the Medi-Cal managed care plan shall demonstrate, on an annual basis, and when
 requested by the department, to the department how the Medi-Cal managed care plan arranged for the delivery of Medi-Cal covered services to Medi-Cal enrollees, such as through the use of either Medi-Cal covered transportation or clinically appropriate video synchronous interaction, as specified in paragraph (6) of subdivision (f), if the enrollees of a Medi-Cal managed care plan needed to obtain health care services from a health care provider or a facility located outside of the time or distance standards, as specified in subdivision (c).

The report shall measure compliance separately for adult and pediatric services for primary care, behavioral health,
 and core specialist services.

(3) (A) Effective for contract periods commencing on or after July 1, 2018, the department shall evaluate on an annual basis a Medi-Cal managed care plan’s compliance with the time or distance and appointment time standards implemented pursuant to this section. This evaluation may include, but need not be limited to, annual and random surveys, investigation of complaints, grievances, or other indicia of noncompliance. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to limit the appeal rights of a Medi-Cal managed care plan under its contracts with the department.

(B) Effective for contract periods commencing on or after January 1, 2029, the evaluation by the department for appointment time standards compliance as described in this paragraph shall be performed using a direct testing method, which shall include, but need not be limited to, a “secret shopper” method. The direct testing shall be used to evaluate compliance with the appointment time standards set forth in
 subdivision (d) for appointments. To determine compliance with the urgent care standard, the evaluation shall measure the network’s ability to provide urgent care within 48 hours pursuant to Section 1367.03 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 1300.67.2.2(c)(5)(A) of Title 28 of the California Code of Regulations. The evaluation shall also utilize a method for accounting for and reporting the number of providers who are unavailable or unreachable for purposes of the evaluation.

(C) Failure to comply with the evaluations required by this paragraph may result in contract termination or the issuance of sanctions pursuant to Section 14197.7.

(4) The department shall publish annually on its internet website a report that details the department’s findings in evaluating a Medi-Cal managed care plan’s compliance under paragraph (2). At a minimum, the department shall specify in this report those Medi-Cal managed care plans, if any, that were subject to a corrective action plan due to noncompliance with the time or distance and appointment time standards implemented pursuant to this section during the
 applicable year and the basis for the department’s finding of noncompliance. The report shall include a Medi-Cal managed care plan’s response to the corrective plan, if available.

(h) The department shall consult with Medi-Cal managed care plans, including dental managed care plans, mental health plans, and Drug Medi-Cal Organized Delivery System programs, health care providers, consumers, providers and consumers of long-term services and supports, and
 organizations representing Medi-Cal beneficiaries in the implementation of the requirements of this section.

(i) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Medi-Cal managed care plan” means any individual, organization, or entity that enters into a contract with the department to provide services to enrolled Medi-Cal beneficiaries pursuant to any of the following:

(A) Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 14087.3), including dental managed care programs developed pursuant to Section 14087.46.

(B) Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5).

(C) Article 2.81 (commencing
 with Section 14087.96).

(D) Article 2.82 (commencing with Section 14087.98).

(E) Article 2.9 (commencing with Section 14088).

(F) Article 2.91 (commencing with Section 14089).

(G) Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), including dental managed care plans.

(H) Chapter 8.9 (commencing with Section 14700).

(I) A county Drug Medi-Cal organized delivery system authorized under the California Medi-Cal 2020 Demonstration pursuant to Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 14184) or a successor demonstration or waiver, as applicable.

(2) “Specialist” means
 any of the following:

(A) Cardiology/interventional cardiology.

(B) Nephrology.

(C) Dermatology.

(D) Neurology.

(E) Endocrinology.

(F) Ophthalmology.

(G) Ear, nose, and throat/otolaryngology.

(H) Orthopedic surgery.

(I) Gastroenterology.

(J) Physical medicine and
 rehabilitation.

(K) General surgery.

(L) Psychiatry.

(M) Hematology.

(N) Oncology.

(O) Pulmonology.

(P) HIV/AIDS specialists/infectious diseases.

(3) “Subcontractor network” means a provider network of a subcontractor or downstream subcontractor, wherein the subcontractor or downstream subcontractor is delegated risk and is responsible for arranging for the provision of, and paying for, covered services as stated in their subcontractor or downstream subcontractor
 agreement.

(j) (1) The department may require enhanced time or distance standards that are more stringent than those set forth in this section in its contracts with Medi-Cal managed care plans. However, the other requirements of this section shall otherwise apply.

(2) The department shall ensure that enhanced time or distance standards contracted for with Medi-Cal managed care plans are consistent across contracts for similar geographic classifications.

(3) The department shall publish all enhanced time and distance standards adopted by contract with a rationale for the enhanced standards.

(k) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section
 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until the time regulations are adopted.

(l) The department shall seek any federal approvals it deems necessary to implement this section. This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(m) (1) In alignment with federal regulation that requires the department to conduct analyses when developing or adjusting network adequacy standards, the
 department shall publish on the department’s internet website by January 1, 2027, a workplan that includes an explanation of the department’s approach to updating network adequacy standards, a description of the data, and a summary of the analyses that will inform the department’s approach.

(2) By January 1, 2027, the department shall convene a stakeholder workgroup to assist in the development of evidence-based network adequacy standards informed by the analyses described in paragraph (1).

(3) The department shall provide
 a 30-day public comment period before implementing any changes to network adequacy standards.

(n) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before
 January 1, 2029, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 418, Sec. 1.   (SB 530)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14197.04.

(a) (1) A Medi-Cal managed care plan that has received approval from the department to utilize an alternative access standard pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 14197, upon the request of an enrollee who is required to travel farther than the time or distance standards, as established in subdivision (c) of Section 14197, shall assist that enrollee in obtaining an appointment with an appropriate specialist provider within the time or distance standards established pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14197 and the appointment time standards established pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 14197.

(2) For purposes of complying with the requirement to assist an enrollee, as specified in paragraph (1), a Medi-Cal managed care plan shall
 do either of the following:

(A) Make its best effort to establish a member-specific case agreement, at the Medi-Cal fee-for-service rate or a rate mutually agreed upon by the specialist provider and the plan, with an appropriate specialist provider within the time or distance standards established pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14197 and the appointment time standards established pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 14197.

(B) Arrange for an appointment with a network specialist provider within the time or distance standards established pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14197, and the appointment time standards established pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 14197.

(3) The requirements of paragraph (1) shall not apply if there is not a specialist provider with an office location within the
 applicable time or distance standards in relation to the area within which the enrollee resides or the Medi-Cal managed care plan has attempted to establish a member-specific case agreement with the specialist provider for any enrollee pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) in the most recent fiscal year and the provider refused to enter into a member-specific case agreement.

(b) If a specialist provider is unavailable to render necessary health care services pursuant to subdivision (a) to an enrollee within the time or distance standards established pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14197 and the appointment time standards established pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 14197, as specified in subdivision (a), the Medi-Cal managed care plan or the Medi-Cal fee-for-service program, as determined appropriate by the department, shall arrange for Medi-Cal covered transportation for an enrollee to obtain covered Medi-Cal services
 pursuant to Section 14132.

(c) A Medi-Cal managed care plan that has received approval from the department to utilize an alternative access standard pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 14197 shall inform its affected members of the approved alternative access standards in a manner and timeframe, as determined by the department.

(d) (1) “Medi-Cal managed care plan” means any individual, organization, or entity that enters into a contract with the department to provide services to enrolled Medi-Cal beneficiaries pursuant to any of the following:

(A) Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 14087.3), including dental managed care programs developed pursuant to Section 14087.46.

(B) Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5).

(C) Article 2.81 (commencing with Section 14087.96).

(D) Article 2.82 (commencing with Section 14087.98).

(E) Article 2.91 (commencing with Section 14089).

(F) Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), including dental managed care plans.

(G) Chapter 8.9 (commencing with Section 14700).

(H) A county Drug Medi-Cal organized delivery system authorized under the California Medi-Cal 2020 Demonstration pursuant to Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 14184) or a successor demonstration or waiver, as applicable.

(2) “Specialist provider” has the same meaning as
 “specialist” as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (i) of Section 14197.
